Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.2001

Supplemental contracts—School district reporting—Report by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

Beginning September 1, 2017, school districts must annually report to the superintendent of public instruction on supplemental contracts entered into subject to RCW 28A.400.200(4) for additional time, responsibility, or incentive. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall summarize the district information and submit an annual report to the education and appropriate fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 505.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 ss 102, 505, and 801: See note following RCW 28A.400.205.

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.